Utah statutes.
10-9a-802.   Enforcement.

(1) (a)  A municipality or any adversely affected owner of real estate within the municipality in which violations of this chapter or ordinances enacted under the authority of this chapter occur or are about to occur may, in addition to other remedies provided by law, institute:

(i)  injunctions, mandamus, abatement, or any other appropriate actions; or

(ii)  proceedings to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove the unlawful building, use, or act.

(b)  A municipality need only establish the violation to obtain the injunction.

(2) (a)  The municipality may enforce the ordinance by withholding building permits.

(b)  It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, or change the use of any building or other structure within a municipality without approval of a building permit.

(c)  The municipality may not issue a building permit unless the plans of and for the proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or use fully conform to all regulations then in effect.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

